Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 39 Governmental Claims
§ 1-39-114.
Statute of limitations.

Except as otherwise provided,
actions against a governmental entity or a public employee acting
within the scope of his duties for torts occurring after June 30,
1979 which are subject to this act shall be forever barred unless
commenced within one (1) year after the date the claim is filed pursuant
to W.S.

1-39-113

. In the case of a minor seven (7) years of age or younger,
actions against a governmental entity or public employee acting within
the scope of his duties for torts occurring after June 30, 1979 which
are subject to this act are forever barred unless commenced within
two (2) years after occurrence or until his eighth birthday, whichever
period is greater. In no case shall the statute of limitations provided
in this section be longer than any other applicable statute of limitations.
In the absence of applicable insurance coverage, if the claim was
properly filed, the statute shall be tolled forty-five (45) days after
a decision by the entity, if the decision was not made and mailed
to the claimant within the statutory time limitation otherwise provided
herein.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Section inapplicable where defendant acting outside “scope of duties.” —

The plaintiff filed an action against the defendant, a school principal, seeking damages, in the alternative, for negligence in representing to the plaintiff that he had been employed as a teacher in the school system, or for breach of an implied contract of employment. An analysis of the school district rules, regulations and statements of policy demonstrated that the defendant could not have been requested, required or authorized to enter into a contract for employment for a teaching position with the plaintiff and, if he did so, he could not have been acting within the “scope of his duties” as a public employee. Therefore, the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, including the one-year period of limitations found in this section, did not apply. Milton v. Mitchell, 762 P.2d 372,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. Oct. 24, 1988).

Plaintiff was not estopped from asserting that defendant acted outside “scope of duties”

because of the allegation in his claim that he had been injured due to the defendant's actions, who “was acting within the scope and course of his employment.” Alternative pleading is authorized by Rule 8(e), W.R.C.P., and is not the same as the changing of statements of fact in separate proceedings. Milton v. Mitchell, 762 P.2d 372,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. Oct. 24, 1988).

Limitations period not commenced where notice of claim insufficient.
—

A notice of claim filed by the plaintiffs against the defendant city did not satisfy the requirements of the art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., and, therefore, did not begin the running of the statute of limitations where the notice of claim was neither signed nor verified by the plaintiff, who declared in an affidavit that he did not prepare it and that neither he nor any member of his family furnished it to the city. Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2001 WY 33, 20 P.3d 521,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2001), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Signature and certification requirement. —

Where persons injured in collisions with State employees presented putative notices of claim that were neither signed by them nor certified under penalty of perjury, those notices of claim were invalid because they did not meet the requirements of Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7, and the belated attempts to cure the deficiencies were ineffective because the limitation period of the nonclaim statute had passed, thereby extinguishing the statutory right to sue the State, and the plaintiffs did not show that the deficient notices of claim were, or could be, salvaged by the savings statute, by the doctrine of equitable estoppel, or as a matter of public policy. Bell v. Schell, 2004 WY 153, 101 P.3d 465,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 2004), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Lawsuit filed within year after untimely claim barred. —

A lawsuit filed within a year after an untimely claim under §

1-39-113

, but not within a year after a timely claim, was barred by this section. Davis v. Casper, 710 P.2d 827,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1985).

Applicability to inverse condemnation. —

Limitation period found in Wyoming Governmental Claims Act applied to an inverse condemnation cause of action and to the homeowners' tort claims against a city, and where the undisputed material facts showed that complaints had been filed well beyond one-year period set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-114

, the claims were time-barred. The district court was correct in applying its statute of limitation analysis to all of the state law claims and in dismissing the action on summary judgment. Lankford v. City of Laramie, 2004 WY 143, 100 P.3d 1238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2004).

Dismissal with prejudice was improper where property owners'
inverse condemnation complaint against a city was filed within the one-year statute of limitations set forth in this section.
Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2008), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Statute of limitations in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

did not apply to an inverse condemnation action because the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-101

et seq., did not apply to such claims, and all prior decisions of the Wyoming Supreme Court to the contrary were reversed. 2013 WY 3,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 2

.

Barred claims cannot be revived. —

Assessment district did not file its action in time with respect to the areas covered in its first claim which was barred by the statute. The inclusion of barred claims with non-barred claims in the second notice of claim filed does not adjust this result; the plain language of the statute prevents a plaintiff from reviving a barred claim by including it in a claim for other damages that is not time barred. Mountain View/Evergreen Improvement & Serv. Dist. v. Brooks Water & Sewer Dist., 896 P.2d 1355,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1995).

Where plaintiff's minivan was struck by a county road grader on October 31, 2007, plaintiff's complaint filed against the county on February 20, 2009 was barred by the one-year period of limitations for bringing an action under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act; likewise, plaintiff's second complaint filed against the county on July 27, 2009 was time-barred. The district court never obtained jurisdiction over the action.
Hall v. Park County, 2010 WY 124, 238 P.3d 580,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2010).

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act (WGCA) does not provide for liability beyond its specific provisions, and there is no provision within the WGCA for application of the savings statute, which is not part of the Act, to causes of action thereunder. Therefore, the savings statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-118

, does not apply to actions filed under the WGCA.
Hall v. Park County, 2010 WY 124, 238 P.3d 580,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2010).

Tolling period not applicable. —

The provision providing for a 45-day tolling period did not apply in an action against a county hospital for wrongful termination of employment as the undisputed evidence showed that the hospital had an insurance policy in effect, that the insurer sent a reservation letter to the hospital after it was advised of the plaintiff's claim, and that at no time did the insurer ever deny coverage and there was never any determination that there was no applicable coverage. Eathorne v. Bd. of Trustees, 2001 WY 36, 21 P.3d 745,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2001).

Plain language
of the Wyoming Medical Review Panel Act of 2005 unambiguously indicates
the tolling period applies to the filing of a “complaint”
in any court against a health care provider, but a notice of claim
is not a “complaint” that must be filed in a “court”;
it must be submitted to the governmental entity alleged to have been
responsible for causing harm to the claimant, and if the condition
is satisfied, the claimant is subject to a one-year statute of limitations
for filing an action. Stroth v. N. Lincoln County Hosp. Dist., 2014 WY 81, 327 P.3d 121,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2014).

Estoppel not applicable. —

Motorist did not establish facts necessary for estoppel to bar a statute of limitations defense where, although the motorist may have been induced by the city attorney to delay filing, she was in no way misled, nor did the city attorney conceal facts to the motorist's detriment. Archuleta v. City of Rawlins, 942 P.2d 404,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Shubert v. Dexter, 891 P.2d 55,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1995); Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Feb. 9, 2010).

Quoted

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Lafferty v. Nickel, 663 P.2d 168,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1983); Nulle v. Gillette-Campbell County Joint Powers Fire Bd., 797 P.2d 1171,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1990); Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2004 WY 31, 86 P.3d 863,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(2004); Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Jul 16, 2014).

Stated

in

Nobles v. Mem'l Hosp. of Laramie County, 2013 WY 66, 301 P.3d 517,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(May 28, 2013).

Construction with other statutes.—

Although a claimant might have up to three years to file a complaint under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-39-113

and

1-39-114

(2017) of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, these provisions do not extend shorter statutes of limitations. The plain language of §

1-39-114

, prohibiting its use to extend shorter statutes of limitations, compels us to apply the statute of limitations at Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-107

. Wyo. Guardianship Corp. v. Wyo. State Hosp., 2018 WY 114, 428 P.3d 424,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2018).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Death action against municipal corporation as subject to statute of limitations governing wrongful death actions or that governing actions against a municipality for injury to person or property, 53 ALR2d 1068.

Waiver of, or estoppel to rely upon, contractual limitation of time for bringing action against municipality or other political subdivision, 81 ALR2d 1039.

Local government tort liability: minority as affecting notice of claim requirement, 58 ALR4th 402.

§ 1-39-115.
Settlement of claims.

Upon receipt of a claim against the state which is covered by insurance, the general services division of the department of administration and information shall send the claim to the insurance company insuring the risk involved for investigation, adjustment, settlement and payment.

A claim shall be settled only if the damage claimed was caused by such negligence on the part of the state or its public employees as might entitle the claimant to a judgment.

Any person whose claim is rejected or who is unsatisfied with the settlement offered may commence an action in the appropriate court.

Claims under this act which are not covered by insurance may be settled as provided by W.S.

1-41-106

or

1-42-204

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, § 1; 1986, ch. 74, § 2; 1988, ch. 45, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2007, ch. 212, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (d) substituted “1-42-204” for “1-42-107” at the end of the sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4, effective June 30, 1988, repealed subsections (a), (b) and (d).

Laws 1988, ch. 6, § 2, repealed Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4, was also amended by Laws 1988, ch. 19, § 1, so as to repeal subsections (a), (b) and (d), effective June 30, 1990. This provision was not given effect due to the repeal of Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4 by Laws 1988, ch. 6, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 212, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Notice requirement applies only to claims against state. —

The notice requirement in subsection (a) applies only to claims against the state, and not to local entities. Eathorne v. Bd. of Trustees, 2001 WY 36, 21 P.3d 745,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2001).

Claims identified as separate for insurance purposes treated
as separate for settlement purposes. —

The settlement of a claim against a governmental employee was not a settlement of another claim against another employee involved in the same transaction or occurrence. These two claims had been identified as separate and different by the state under subsection (a). Consequently, the settlement of the first claim did not bar the assertion of the second claim pursuant to § 1-39-116(b). State v. Dieringer, 708 P.2d 1,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 578

(Wyo. 1985).

Writ
of mandamus. —

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in declining to issue a writ of mandamus where the notice of the employee's claim sought payments denied under the State Employees'
and Officials'
Group Plan (Group Plan), the risk manager's duty was not clear and certain, and had the risk manager investigated the claim as required she likely would have denied it on the ground that the employee had not exhausted the Group Plan appeals process.
State ex rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2009).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Estoppel as to claim against municipality, 1 ALR2d 338.

Contributory negligence as defense in action by municipality, 1 ALR2d 827.

Power of city as to compromise of claim, 15 ALR2d 1359.

Liability of state or municipality in tort for damages arising out of sale of intoxicating liquor by state or municipally operated liquor store or establishment, 95 ALR3d 1243.

Validity, as against claim under 42 USCS § 1983, of accused's release-dismissal agreement, under which release of civil claims, against public officials or entities, growing out of criminal charges, is given to obtain relief from those charges — Post-Newton Cases, 139 ALR Fed 1.

§ 1-39-116.
Exclusiveness of remedy.

The remedy against a governmental entity as provided by this act is exclusive, and no other claim, civil action or proceeding for damages, by reason of the same transaction or occurrence which was the subject matter of the original claim, civil action or proceeding may be brought against the governmental entity. No rights of a governmental entity to contribution, indemnity or subrogation shall be impaired by this section. Nothing in this section prohibits any proceedings for mandamus, prohibition, habeas corpus, injunction or quo warranto.

The judgment in an action or a settlement under this act constitutes a complete bar to any action by the claimant, by reason of the same transaction or occurrence which was the subject matter of the original suit or claim, against the governmental entity or the public employee whose negligence gave rise to the claim.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Action against school district governed by chapter. —

While §

21-3-129

allows an action against a school district to the extent of its liability insurance, such an action must be brought pursuant to the procedures outlined in this chapter. Dye ex rel. Dye v. Fremont County Sch. Dist. No. 24, Dye v. Fremont County Sch. Dist., 820 P.2d 982,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1991).

Action between two governmental entities involving state educational
funding. —

The Wyoming Governmental Claims Act is not applicable to an action between two governmental entities when the relief sought is a declaration of rights and liabilities of the governmental entitles under statutes affecting state educational funding and for the recovery of monies that should have been distributed in the past. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Claims identified as separate for insurance purposes treated
as separate for settlement purposes. —

The settlement of a claim against a governmental employee was not a settlement of another claim against another employee involved in the same transaction or occurrence. These two claims had been identified as separate and different by the state under § 1-39-115(a). Consequently, the settlement of the first claim did not bar the assertion of the second claim pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. State v. Dieringer, 708 P.2d 1,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 578

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Stated

in

Dee v. Laramie County, 666 P.2d 957,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

§ 1-39-117.
Jurisdiction; appeals; venue; trial by jury; liability insurance.

Original and exclusive jurisdiction for any claim filed in state court under this act shall be in the district courts of Wyoming. Appeals may be taken as provided by law.

Venue for any claim against the state or its public employees pursuant to this act shall be in the county in which the public employee resides or the cause of action arose or in Laramie county. Venue for all other claims pursuant to this act shall be in the county in which the defendant resides or in which the principal office of the governmental entity is located.

The right to a trial by jury is preserved.

If a governmental entity has elected to purchase liability insurance under this act, the court, in a trial without a jury, may be advised of the insurance.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1987, ch. 93, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 101.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), inserted “filed in state court.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Section unconstitutional. —

This section, which purports to confine exclusive original jurisdiction for any claim under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act to the district courts of Wyoming is unconstitutional to the extent that it limits supplemental jurisdiction of a federal district court over tort claims against school districts, counties, and municipalities, and other lesser governmental entities. Scott v. School Dist. No. 6, 815 F. Supp. 424, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2899 (D. Wyo. 1993).

Court without jurisdiction to declare government's printing
of money unconstitutional. —

The Governmental Claims Act did not confer jurisdiction upon a district court to declare that the United States government's printing of paper money was unconstitutional and that, therefore, a worker's compensation claimant was entitled to be paid in gold or silver. Further, such a claim was frivolous and there was no reasonable cause for the appeal from its dismissal, justifying an award, under Rule 10.05, W.R.A.P., of a fee of $100 as part of the costs. Skurdal v. State, 708 P.2d 1241,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 601

(Wyo. 1985).

Venue.—

Energy company’s bond forfeiture complaint under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act against the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission and the Wyoming Office of State Lands and Investments was properly dismissed because the complaint was filed in the wrong venue, as the cause of action did not arise in the county in which the complaint was filed.Black Diamond Energy of Del., Inc. v. Wyo. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 2020 WY 45, 460 P.3d 740,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2020).

Subject matter jurisdiction. —

Litigant's failure to allege compliance with constitutional and statutory requirements does not and cannot affect a court's subject matter jurisdiction to act; pursuant to the constitution and this section, the district courts have jurisdiction to hear and decide actions brought against governmental entities, whether or not compliance is alleged, if a notice of claim complying with the constitutional and statutory requirements has been presented. District courts also have jurisdiction to allow the amendment of a complaint to allege presentation of a notice of claim complying with the statute and constitution when such a notice was in fact timely presented; to the extent that Board of Trustees of UW v. Bell, 662 P.2d 410,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1983), and its progeny held otherwise, those decisions are overruled.
.

When plaintiff injured motorist filed suit against defendant city after his vehicle was struck by a vehicle driven by a police officer, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction under this section to determine whether plaintiff complied with the requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-114

and Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7 for filing suit against a governmental entity. Upon presentation of proof that plaintiff had complied with those provisions by providing a notice of claim to the city, the district court also had subject matter jurisdiction to allow him to amend his complaint to so allege.
Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985); Wooster v. Carbon County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2005 WY 47, 109 P.3d 893,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(2005).

Cited

in

Kahrs v. Board of Trustees for Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 901 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1995); Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Jul 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

§ 1-39-118.
Maximum liability; insurance authorized.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, in any action under this act, the liability of the governmental entity, including a public employee while acting within the scope of his duties, shall not exceed:

The sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) to any claimant for any number of claims arising out of a single transaction or occurrence; or

The sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) for all claims of all claimants arising out of a single transaction or occurrence.

A governmental entity is authorized to purchase liability insurance coverage covering any acts or risks including all or any portion of the risks provided under this act. Purchase of liability insurance coverage shall extend the governmental entity’s liability as follows:

If a governmental entity has insurance coverage either exceeding the limits of liability as stated in this section or covering liability which is not authorized by this act, the governmental entity’s liability is extended to the coverage;

Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this subsection, if a governmental entity acquires coverage in an amount greater than the limits specified in this section for the purpose of protecting itself against potential losses under a federal law and if the purpose of the coverage is stated as a part of or by an amendment to the insurance policy, the increased limits shall be applicable only to claims brought under the federal law.

In addition to the procurement of insurance under subsection (b) of this section a local governmental entity may:

Establish a self-insurance fund against the liability of the governmental entity and its officers and employees;

Join with other governmental entities, by joint powers agreements under W.S.

16-1-102

through

16-1-108

, or otherwise, to pool funds and establish a self-insurance fund or jointly purchase insurance coverage. Pooled funds may be deposited with the state treasurer for disbursement as participating governmental entities direct or may be deposited as provided by the terms of the joint powers agreement;

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 142, § 2.

Pay the judgment or settlement, with interest thereon, in not to exceed ten (10) annual installments in cases of undue hardship and levy not to exceed one (1) mill per year on the assessed value of the governmental entity for such purpose;

Enter into contracts with the general services division of the department of administration and information for the payment of assessments by the local government in such amounts as determined by the division to be sufficient, on an actuarially sound basis, to cover:

The potential liability, or any portion of potential liability, of the local government and its public employees as provided by this act;

Costs of administration;

Payment by the division of claims against the local government and its public employees acting within the scope of their duties which have been settled or reduced to final judgment.

No judgment against a governmental entity shall include an award for exemplary or punitive damages, for interest prior to judgments or for attorney’s fees.

Except as hereafter provided, no judgment authorized by this act may be enforced by execution or attachment of property of a governmental entity but shall be paid only as authorized by this section and W.S.

1-39-113

. A judgment authorized by this act may be enforced by execution or attachment of the property of a governmental entity to the extent coverage of the liability has not been obtained under subsection (b) or (c) of this section or W.S.

1-39-115

unless the judgment is otherwise satisfied by the governmental entity.

The liability imposed by W.S.

1-39-105

through

1-39-112

may include liability for property damage in an amount less than five hundred dollars ($500.00) in cases in which no personal injury or death resulted, but only under the following conditions:

A property damage claim may be paid at the discretion of the governmental entity:

In the case of the state, the director of the department of administration and information or an employee designated in writing by the director shall decide whether the claim will be paid;

In the case of a local governmental entity, the local governmental entity shall appoint an official who shall decide whether the claim will be paid.

The decision of whether the property damage claim will be paid shall be based on finding that:

The act was performed by an employee of the state or the local governmental entity;

The act occurred while the employee was acting within the scope of his employment duties;

The employee acted negligently by breaching a duty or by failing to act like a reasonable person; and

The negligent act proximately caused the property damage at issue.

Property damage claims against the state shall be paid from the self-insurance account created by W.S.

1-41-103

except that claims against the department of transportation may be paid from nonrestricted highway funds. Property damage claims against a local governmental entity shall be paid only to the extent the local governing body has appropriated monies for that purpose. There is no obligation on the state legislature or the local governing body to make any appropriation for payment of property damage claims;

If the director of the department of administration and information or the local government official determines there may be insufficient monies to pay all of the claims made during the year, then the director or official may delay paying the claims until close of the year at which time available monies shall be prorated among those entitled to payment at an amount less than one hundred percent (100%);

The decisions of the director of the department of administration and information or of the local government official are final and are not subject to administrative or judicial review.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 81, § 2; ch. 89, § 2; 1988, ch. 45, § 1; 1989, ch. 110, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 241, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the local government self-insurance program, see §

1-42-201

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Sufficient pleading for motion to dismiss purposes.—

Client specifically alleged that the insurance coverage exception applied and the public defenders claimed information beyond the face of the amended complaint established the absence of liability insurance; however, such information could not be considered by the district court on a motion to dismiss, where the only question was whether the client pleaded the insurance coverage exception, which he did here. Dockter v. Lozano, 2020 WY 119, 472 P.3d 362,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2020).

Scope of state immunity. —

This state retains immunity from tort actions for the state in any amount not covered by insurance unless the state's permission to sue has been granted. Oyler v. State, 618 P.2d 1042,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1980).

General immunity afforded by this chapter does not apply when a governmental agency has purchased insurance coverage for the liability which is the subject of suit. Helm v. Board of County Comm'rs, 989 P.2d 1273,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1999).

Because an insurance policy did not cover claims for a breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing, the purchase of such did not waive a school district's immunity in a case arising from an employment dispute.
Metz v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2007 WY 166, 173 P.3d 334,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 2007).

District court erred in denying a hospital’s summary judgment motion because waived its immunity to ostensible agency claims under the insurance exception inasmuch as the coverage in the insurance policy at issue did no more than provide coverage for the hospital’s liability under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, and, therefore, did not extend the hospital’s liability to include liability for its apparent agents. Mem'l Hosp. of Sweetwater Cty. v. Menapace, 2017 WY 131, 404 P.3d 1179,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2017).

Immunity not waived. —

Participation by local governments in a pool fund pursuant to subsection (c)(ii) is not the purchase of liability insurance coverage and, therefore, no waiver of governmental immunity results. City of Laramie v. Facer, 814 P.2d 268,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1991).

Exception to governmental immunity based on insurance coverage was applicable to claims arising from the death of a student passenger on a district bus since design of the bus route and stop locations and negligent instructions to student-pedestrians exiting the bus constituted use of the covered bus. Sperry v. Fremont County Sch. Dist. No. 6, 84 F. Supp. 3d 1277, 2015 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13910 (D. Wyo. 2015).

Trial court
properly granted a school district and a teacher summary judgment
in a student's action to recover for injuries he sustained during
a science demonstration conducted in a school gymnasium because the
student's claims did not fall within the waiver of governmental immunity
for operation or maintenance of a building or recreation are; the
school district did not obtain insurance coverage that would extend
its liability beyond the provisions of the Wyoming Governmental Claims
Act. Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98, 353 P.3d 732,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2015).

Prejudgment interest on arbitration awards against governmental entities is not available.

Hot Springs County Sch. Dist. v. Strube Constr. Co., 715 P.2d 540,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1986).

Appeal. —

Because it did not involve the purely legal issue of whether a hospital was immune from suit under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, the supreme court dismissed the hospital’s appeal of the denial of summary judgment with respect to the statute and proximate cause for lack of jurisdiction; the statute related to the State’s liability, not its immunity from suit, and proximate cause did not address the hospital’s immunity from suit but rather whether it would ultimately be found liable. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Applied

in

Cranston v. Weston County Weed & Pest Bd., 826 P.2d 251,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1992); Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Pickle v. Board of County Comm'rs, 764 P.2d 262,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1988).

Stated

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Daley v. Wenzel, 2001 WY 80, 30 P.3d 547,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Interest on claim against a governmental unit in absence of provision in contract or express statutory provision, 24 ALR2d 928.

Liability or indemnity insurance carried by governmental unit as affecting immunity from tort liability, 68 ALR2d 1437.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance limiting the kinds or amount of actual damages recoverable in tort action against governmental unit, 43 ALR4th 19.

Payment of attorneys' services in defending action brought against officials individually as within power or obligation of public body, 47 ALR5th 553.

§ 1-39-119.
Application of provisions.

The provisions of this
act shall not affect any provision of law, regulation or agreement
governing employer-employee relationships.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Severability. —

Section 4, ch. 157, Laws 1979, reads: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Tort claims arising out of employment relationship not excepted.
—

This section does not serve to except claims which have their genesis in tort even though they arise out of an employment relationship. Board of Trustees v. Bell, 662 P.2d 410,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1983), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Nor are contract claims. —

A claim for damages against the state for breach of the employment relationship based either in contract or tort must proceed, if at all, in accordance with the Governmental Claims Act, §

1-39-101

et seq. Allen v. Lucero, 925 P.2d 228,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. Oct. 29, 1996), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Because an insurance policy did not cover claims for a breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing, the purchase of such did not waive a school district's immunity in a case arising from an employment dispute.
Metz v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2007 WY 166, 173 P.3d 334,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Eathorne v. Bd. of Trustees, 2001 WY 36,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 47

, 21 P.3d 745 (Wyo. 2001).